Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202281-5,238
Temporary and emergency elevator mechanic thirty-day licenses.

The State Fire Marshal shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations establishing standards and procedures for the issuance of temporary and emergency elevator mechanic thirty-day licenses and for the extension of such licenses for good cause shown.

Laws 2006, LB 489, § 29;

R.S.1943, (2010), § 48-2529;

Laws 2019, LB301, § 74.